Missouri, session 2026, HB3289.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 476.001, 476.015, 476.050, 476.055, 476.056, 476.1000,
476.1025, 478.003, 478.250, 483.082, 483.390, 509.520, 510.030, and 561.031, RSMo, and
section 483.140 as enacted by house bill no. 1231, ninety-seventh general assembly, second
regular session, and section 483.140 as enacted by house bill nos. 1665 & 1335, ninety-
seventh general assembly, second regular session, are repealed and twelve new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 476.050, 476.055, 476.056, 476.1025,
478.003, 478.250, 483.005, 483.082, 483.140, 483.390, 509.520, and 510.030, to read as
follows:
476.050. All writs, process, proceedings and records in any court, and in all inferior
tribunals established by law, shall be in the English language, except that the proper and
known names of process and technical words may be expressed in the language heretofore
and now commonly used, and shall be made in a fair, legible character, in words at length,
and not abbreviated; but such abbreviations as are now commonly used in the English
language may be used, and numbers may be expressed by Arabic figures or Roman numerals,
in the customary way. Notwithstanding [the foregoing] any other provision of law to the
contrary, such writs, processes, proceedings and records may be filed, submitted, stored, and
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 3289 2
maintained in an electronic format or otherwise in the manner provided by supreme court
rule.
476.055. 1. There is hereby established in the state treasury the "Statewide Court
Automation Fund". All moneys collected pursuant to section 488.027, as well as gifts,
contributions, devises, bequests, and grants received relating to statewide court automation
[of judicial record keeping], and moneys received by the [judicial system] judiciary for the
dissemination of information [and], sales of publications, or other provision of electronic
services developed relating to statewide court automation [of judicial record keeping], as
authorized by the court automation committee, shall be credited to the fund. Moneys
credited to this fund may only be used for the purposes set forth in this section and as
appropriated by the general assembly. Any unexpended balance remaining in the statewide
court automation fund at the end of each biennium shall not be subject to the provisions of
section 33.080 requiring the transfer of such unexpended balance to general revenue.
2. The statewide court automation fund shall be administered by a court automation
committee consisting of the following[: the chief justice of the supreme court,] members:
(1) A judge from the court of appeals, four circuit judges, four associate circuit
judges, four employees of [the circuit court,] circuit courts, and two employees who work
full time in a municipal division of a circuit court, [the commissioner of administration,] each
of whom shall be appointed by the chief justice of the Missouri supreme court;
(2) Two members of the Missouri Bar, appointed by the governors of the
Missouri Bar;
(3) Two members of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the
house, with one member being from the majority party and one member being from the
minority party;
(4) Two members of the senate appointed by the president pro [tem] tempore of the
senate, with one member being from the majority party and one member being from the
minority party; and
(5) Four additional ex officio members as follows:
(a) The chief justice of the Missouri supreme court, or the chief justice's
designee;
(b) The commissioner of administration, or the commissioner's designee;
(c) The executive director of the Missouri [Office of Prosecution Services,] office of
prosecution services, or the executive director's designee; and
(d) The director of the state public defender system, [and two members of the
Missouri Bar. The judge members and employee members shall be appointed by the chief
justice. The commissioner of administration shall serve ex officio. The members of the
Missouri Bar shall be appointed by the board of governors of the Missouri Bar. Any member

HCS HB 3289 3
of the committee may designate another person to serve on the committee in place of the
committee member] or the director's designee.

The appointed members of the committee shall serve for terms of two years and until
their successors are appointed and qualified. The members of the committee shall be
reimbursed from the statewide court automation fund for their actual expenses in
performing their official duties on the committee.
3. The committee shall develop and [implement a plan for] maintain a statewide
court automation system. The committee shall have the authority to hire consultants, review
systems in other jurisdictions,and purchase goods and services to administer the provisions of
this section. The committee may implement [one or more] pilot projects in the state [for the
purposes of determining the feasibility of developing and implementing such plan. The
members of the committee shall be reimbursed from the court automation fund for their actual
expenses in performing their official duties on the committee] at any time.
4. Any purchase of computer software or computer hardware that exceeds five
thousand dollars shall be made pursuant to the requirements of the office of administration for
lowest and best bid. Such bids shall be subject to acceptance by the office of administration.
The court automation committee shall determine the specifications for such bids.
5. The court automation committee shall not require any circuit court to change any
operating system in such court, unless the committee provides all [necessary] personnel,
funds, and equipment necessary to effectuate the required changes. No judicial circuit or
county may be reimbursed for any costs incurred pursuant to this subsection unless such
judicial circuit or county has the approval of the court automation committee prior to
incurring the specific cost.
6. [Any] The court automation system, including any pilot project, shall be
[implemented,] operated and maintained in accordance with strict standards for the security
and privacy of confidential judicial records, as provided by supreme court rule. Any
person who knowingly releases information from a confidential judicial record is guilty of a
class B misdemeanor. Any person who, knowing that a judicial record is confidential, uses
information from such confidential record for financial gain is guilty of a class E felony.
7. [On the first day of February, May, August and November] No later than the
fifteenth of January of each year, the court automation committee shall electronically file a
report on the progress of the statewide court automation system with the chairs of the
following committees:
(1) The [chair of the] house budget committee, or its successor committee;
(2) The [chair of the] senate appropriations committee, or its successor committee;
(3) The [chair of the] house judiciary committee, or its successor committee; and

HCS HB 3289 4
(4) The [chair of the] senate judiciary committee, or its successor committee.
[8. The court automation committee established pursuant to this section may continue
to function until completion of its duties prescribed by this section.]
476.056. [1.] Any city, county, village, or other municipality may provide for the
automation of its municipal court [pursuant to] as part of the statewide court automation
system established under subsection 3 of section 476.055, in the manner provided in this
section. In order to make such provisions, such municipality must:
(1) Adopt an ordinance imposing the surcharge in the amount allowed, and payable in
the manner provided, by section [476.053] 488.027, and sections 488.010 to 488.020;
(2) Enter into an agreement with the state courts administrator for automation of the
municipality's court. Such agreement may provide for continuation of the surcharge for a
minimum period of time, payable to the fund established by section 476.055[, or a special
fund established in the state treasury for such purpose upon expiration of section 476.055,];
for payment of a guaranteed minimum annual amount in the event that payment of such
surcharges shall not offset the cost of the automation of the municipality's court; and such
other terms as may be agreed on between the municipality and the state courts administrator.
[2. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 476.053, the payment of any surcharge
provided by this section may continue for a period in excess of that allowed by section
476.053 for payment of surcharges in the circuit courts. The provisions of section 33.080
shall not apply to any special fund established pursuant to this section.]
476.1025. A parent, spouse, child, or personal representative of a person who was
convicted of a misdemeanor offense may file a motion with the court in which the person was
convicted to have the record of such offense made confidential in [any automated case
management] the statewide court automation system if such person has been deceased for
six months or more. Upon such motion accompanied by a copy of the death certificate of the
deceased person, the court shall make the case confidential. Prior to making the case
confidential, the court shall determine whether any person would be unfairly prejudiced by
making such record confidential in any automated case management system.
478.003. 1. In any judicial circuit of this state, a majority of the judges of the circuit
court may designate a judge to hear cases arising in the circuit subject to the provisions of
sections 478.001 to 478.009. In lieu thereof and subject to appropriations or other funds
available for such purpose, a majority of the judges of the circuit court may appoint a person
or persons to act as treatment court commissioners. Each commissioner shall be appointed
for a term of four years, but may be removed at any time by a majority of the judges of the
circuit court. The qualifications, compensation, and retirement benefits of the commissioner
shall be the same as that of an associate circuit judge. If the compensation of a commissioner
appointed pursuant to this section is provided from other than state funds, the source of such

HCS HB 3289 5
fund shall pay to and reimburse the state for the actual costs of the salary and benefits of the
commissioner. The commissioner shall have all the powers and duties of a circuit judge,
except that any order, judgment or decree of the commissioner shall be confirmed or rejected
by an associate circuit or circuit judge by order of record entered within the time the judge
could set aside such order, judgment or decree had the same been made by the judge. If so
confirmed, the order, judgment or decree shall have the same effect as if made by the judge on
the date of its confirmation.
2. The Missouri supreme court may assign a treatment court commissioner to serve in
the treatment court division of a circuit other than the circuit in which the commissioner is
appointed. The transfer shall only be ordered with the consent and approval of the presiding
judge of the circuit to which the commissioner is to be assigned.
3. A treatment court commissioner may serve as a commissioner in any treatment
court as designated by the treatment court coordinating commission, subject to local court
rules.
4. In each circuit having a treatment court division that has neither a treatment
court administrator nor a treatment court commissioner, the court shall employ a
treatment court administrator, subject to appropriations or other funds available for
such purpose. If the compensation of an administrator employed pursuant to this
subsection is provided from other than state funds, the source of such funds shall pay to
and reimburse the state for the actual costs of the salary and benefits of the
administrator.
478.250. 1. Until otherwise provided by court rule authorized by the constitution or
by court order authorized by law, cases shall continue to be filed in the same places and the
same filing, docketing and assignment of case procedures shall apply as were in effect on
January 1, 1979, with respect to the same categories of cases.
2. In those counties with centralized filing, if a case is within those categories of cases
enumerated in subdivisions (1) and (2) of subsection 1 of section 517.011, the plaintiff when
filing the case may designate at the time of filing that the case shall be heard and determined
under the civil practice and procedure applicable before circuit judges, and in such event the
case shall be heard and determined by a circuit judge unless an associate circuit judge shall be
assigned or transferred to hear and determine the case [pursuant to] under section 478.240 or
478.245 or Section 6 of Article V of the Constitution. If no such designation is made, the case
shall be heard and determined under chapter 517.
3. In the assignment of cases to associate circuit judges in circuit courts with more
than one resident associate circuit judge, insofar as is reasonably possible and consistent with
the proper administration of justice, assignments made either pursuant to local circuit court
rule or by the presiding judge:

HCS HB 3289 6
(1) Shall not effect an assignment of the cause from the courthouse where the case is
filed to another courthouse in the county for hearing without the consent of the parties shown
except for good cause shown; and
(2) Shall be made in such manner as will assure that when a litigant or counsel
simultaneously file a number of cases of a similar character to be heard before an associate
circuit judge, such cases will be assigned as a group to a single associate circuit judge or in
such other manner as will reasonably assure that they will be processed and heard without
setting or return date conflicts which would require counsel to appear on multiple occasions
or at conflicting times.
4. The provisions of subsection 3 of this section shall apply as to assignments made
where a centralized docketing procedure has been adopted by local court order under the
provisions of subsection 4 of section 478.245.
483.005. As used in this chapter and section 476.055, the following terms mean:
(1) "Case record", all records in a case file relating to a specific case or
controversy, as defined in supreme court rule;
(2) "Confidential information":
(a) The full date of birth of any party or minor child;
(b) The full Social Security number of any party or any minor child;
(c) The driver's license number, state identification number, taxpayer
identification number, and passport number of any party;
(d) The full financial institution account number, credit or debit card number,
personal identification number, or password used to secure any such accounts or cards,
of any party;
(e) The name and address of any individual who is known to be a minor child
and, if applicable, any next friend of the minor child; or
(f) Any other information sealed, expunged, or closed under statute, supreme
court rule, or order of a court of record;
(3) "Confidential record" or "confidential judicial record", as such term is
defined in Missouri supreme court rules;
(4) "Minor child", a person under eighteen years of age, except for:
(a) An emancipated minor as defined in section 302.178;
(b) A juvenile who has been certified to stand trial as an adult for offenses under
section 211.071; or
(c) A juvenile fifteen and one-half years of age or older who is alleged to have
violated a state or municipal traffic ordinance or regulation.
483.082. 1. Notwithstanding [the provision of] any other [statute] provision of law
to the contrary, it shall be the duty of the clerks of all courts to keep such records of the courts

HCS HB 3289 7
and in such a manner as may be directed by rule of the supreme court so that they shall
accurately record all essential matters relating to the causes and matters within the jurisdiction
of the court which are and have been pending before the court, including pleadings, motions
and related documents, transactions, orders and judgments or decrees related thereto showing
the course and disposition of causes and matters, the taxing and collection of court costs, and
the setting of trial calendars or dockets of pending cases.
2. Recognizing that improved methods and systems of keeping records and data have
been and will continue to be developed from time to time and that all court clerks should be
empowered to utilize improved methods, systems, and techniques of keeping records of
essential matters, and notwithstanding [the provisions of any other statute] any other
provision of law to the contrary, the methods, form,and systems of keeping all such files and
records shall be as directed and approved by rule of the supreme court.
3. Subject to the provisions of the supreme court rules and the supervisory
jurisdiction of the supreme court, confidential information and confidential records in a
case record shall be maintained so as to be inaccessible to the general public under
supreme court rules governing access to records of the judicial branch of Missouri.
[483.140. It shall be the special duty of every judge of a court of
record to examine into and superintend the manner in which the rolls and
records of the court are made up and kept; to prescribe orders that will procure
uniformity, regularity and accuracy in the transaction of the business of the
court; to require that the records and files be properly maintained and entries
be made at the proper times as required by law or supreme court rule, and that
the duties of the clerks be performed according to law and supreme court rule;
and if any clerk fail to comply with the law, the court shall proceed against him
as for a misdemeanor. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to
permit the adoption of any local court rule that grants a judge the discretion to
remove or direct the removal of any pleading, file, or communication from a
court file or record without the agreement of all parties.]
483.140. It shall be the special duty of every judge of a court of record to examine
into and superintend the manner in which the rolls and records of the court are made up and
kept; to prescribe orders that will procure uniformity, regularity and accuracy in the
transaction of the business of the court; to require that the records and files be properly
maintained and entries be made at the proper times as required by law or supreme court rule,
and that the duties of the clerks be performed according to law and supreme court rule; and if
any clerk fail to comply with the law, the court shall proceed against [him] the clerk as for a
misdemeanor. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to permit the adoption of
any local court rule that grants a judge the discretion to remove or direct the removal of any
pleading, file, or communication from a court file or record without notification to the parties
and [providing the parties] an opportunity for the parties to respond.

HCS HB 3289 8
483.390. 1. In all civil actions any party interested therein may, upon payment of the
fees, have any or all of the following [papers recorded] documents filed in the office of the
clerk of the circuit court in the county in which such action is brought: Petitions, summons,
affidavit for publication of notice to nonresident or unknown defendants, sheriff's, or other
officer's, return of service to summons, proof of publication of notices to nonresident or
unknown defendants, answers, motions, notices of sale of property involved and proof of its
publication, return of sale by any sheriff, commissioner, or other officer, in case of sale of real
estate, affidavit of commissioner, notice to parties by commissioner in partition, and any other
[paper] document or pleading tending to show the service on the defendants for their
appearance in such case.
2. The clerk of the circuit court shall charge the sum of ten cents per one hundred
words for the [recording of papers] filing of documents as provided in this section, which
sum shall be paid into the county treasury.
509.520. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, beginning
August 28, [2023] 2026, pleadings, attachments, or exhibits filed with the court in any case,
as well as any judgments [or orders] issued by the court, [or other records of the court] shall
not include [the following confidential and personal identifying information]:
(1) The full Social Security number of any party or any child who is the subject of
an order of custody or support; or
(2) The full credit card number[, financial institution account number, personal
identification number, or password used to secure an account] or other financial account
number of any party[;
(3) The full motor vehicle operator license number;
(4) Victim information, including the name, address, and other contact information of
the victim;
(5) Witness information, including the name, address, and other contact information
of the witness;
(6) Any other full state identification number;
(7) The name, address, and date of birth of a minor and, if applicable, any next friend;
or
(8) The full date of birth of any party; however, the year of birth shall be made
available, except for a minor.
2. The information provided under subsection 1 of this section shall be provided in a
confidential information filing sheet contemporaneously filed with the court or entered by the
court, which shall not be subject to public inspection or availability.
3. Nothing in this section shall preclude an entity including, but not limited to, a
financial institution, insurer, insurance support organization, or consumer reporting agency

HCS HB 3289 9
that is otherwise permitted by law to access state court records from using a person's unique
identifying information to match such information contained in a court record to validate that
person's record.
4. The Missouri supreme court shall promulgate rules to administer this section].
[5.] 2. Contemporaneously with the filing of every petition for dissolution of
marriage, legal separation, motion for modification, action to establish paternity, and petition
or motion for support or custody of a minor child, the filing party shall file a confidential case
filing sheet with the court which shall not be subject to public inspection and which provides:
(1) The name and address of the current employer and the Social Security number of
the petitioner or movant, if a person;
(2) If known to the petitioner or movant, the name and address of the current
employer and the Social Security number of the respondent; and
(3) The names, dates of birth, and Social Security numbers of any children subject to
the action.
[6.] 3. Contemporaneously with the filing of every responsive pleading petition for
dissolution of marriage, legal separation, motion for modification, action to establish
paternity, and petition or motion for support or custody of a minor child, the responding party
shall file a confidential case filing sheet with the court which shall not be subject to public
inspection and which provides:
(1) The name and address of the current employer and the Social Security number of
the responding party, if a person;
(2) If known to the responding party, the name and address of the current employer
and the Social Security number of the petitioner or movant; and
(3) The names, dates of birth, and Social Security numbers of any children subject to
the action.
[7.] 4. The full Social Security number of any party or child subject to an order of
custody or support shall be retained by the court on the confidential case filing sheet or other
confidential record maintained in conjunction with the administration of the case. The full
credit card number or other financial account number of any party may be retained by the
court on a confidential record if it is necessary to maintain the number in conjunction with the
administration of the case.
[8.] 5. Any document described in subsection 1 of this section shall, in lieu of the full
number, include only the last four digits of any such number.
[9.] 6. Except as provided in section 452.430, the clerk shall not be required to redact
any document described in subsection 1 of this section issued or filed before August 28, 2009,
prior to releasing the document to the public.

HCS HB 3289 10
[10.] 7. For good cause shown, the court may release information contained on the
confidential case filing sheet; except that, any state agency acting under authority of chapter
454 shall have access to information contained herein without court order in carrying out their
official duty.
510.030. 1. Upon motion of any party showing good cause therefor and upon notice
to all other parties, the court in which an action is pending may:
(1) Order any party to produce and permit the inspection and copying or
photographing, by or on behalf of the moving party, of any designated documents, papers,
books, accounts, letters, photographs, objects, or tangible things, not privileged, which
constitute or contain evidence material to any matter involved in the action and which are in
[his] the party's possession, custody, or control; or
(2) Order any party to permit entry upon designated land or other property in [his] the
party's possession or control for the purpose of inspecting, measuring, surveying, sampling,
or photographing the property or any designated relevant object or operation thereon. The
order shall specify the time, place, and manner of making the inspection and taking the copies
and photographs and may prescribe such terms and conditions as are just.
2. A party may obtain without the required showing a statement concerning the action
or its subject matter previously made by that party. For purposes of this subsection, a
statement previously made is a written statement signed or otherwise adopted or approved by
the person making it, or a stenographic, mechanical, electrical, audio, video, motion picture or
other recording, or a transcription thereof, of the party or of a statement made by the party and
contemporaneously recorded.
[476.001. An efficient, well operating and productive judiciary is
essential to the preservation of the people's liberty and prosperity. In order to
achieve this goal, the general assembly and the supreme court must constantly
be aware of the operations, needs, strengths and weaknesses of the judicial
system. It is the purpose of sections 476.001, 476.055, 476.330 to 476.380,
476.412, 476.681, and 477.405 to provide the general assembly and the
supreme court with the mechanisms to obtain on a continuing basis a
comprehensive analysis of judicial resources and an efficient and organized
method of identifying the problems and needs as they occur. It is the further
purpose of sections 476.001, 476.055, 476.330 to 476.380, 476.412, 476.681,
477.405, 478.073, and 478.320 to provide a system for the efficient allocation
of available personnel, facilities and resources to achieve a uniform and
effective operation of the judicial system.]
[476.015. House Bill 1634 of the 2nd regular session of the 79th
general assembly shall be known and may be cited as the "Court Reform and
Revision Act of 1978".]

HCS HB 3289 11
[476.1000. All courts that require mandatory electronic filing shall
accept, file, and docket a notice of entry of appearance filed by an attorney in a
criminal case if such filing does not exceed one page in length and was sent by
fax or regular mail. The provisions of this section shall expire on December
31, 2016.]
[561.031. 1. In the following proceedings, the provisions of section
544.250, 544.270, 544.275, 546.030, or of any other statute, or the provisions
of supreme court rules 21.10, 22.07, 24.01, 24.02, 27.01, 29.07, 31.02, 31.03,
36.01, 37.16, 37.47, 37.48, 37.50, 37.57, 37.58, 37.59, and 37.64 to the
contrary notwithstanding, when the physical appearance in person in court is
required of any person, such personal appearance may be made by means of
two-way audio-visual communication, including but not limited to closed
circuit television or computerized video conferencing; provided that such
audio-visual communication facilities provide two-way audio-visual
communication between the court and the person:
(1) First appearance before an associate circuit judge on a criminal
complaint;
(2) Waiver of preliminary hearing and preliminary hearing with
consent of the defendant;
(3) Arraignment on an information or indictment where a plea of not
guilty is entered;
(4) Arraignment on an information or indictment where a plea of
guilty is entered upon waiver of any right such person might have to be
physically present;
(5) Any pretrial or posttrial criminal proceeding not allowing the
cross-examination of witnesses;
(6) Sentencing after conviction at trial upon waiver of any right such
person might have to be physically present;
(7) Sentencing after entry of a plea of guilty;
(8) Any civil proceeding other than trial by jury;
(9) Any civil or criminal proceeding which is not required to be a
matter of record; and
(10) Any civil or criminal proceeding by the consent of the parties.
2. This section shall not prohibit other appearances via closed circuit
television upon waiver of any right such person held in custody or
confinement might have to be physically present.
3. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed as establishing
a right for any person held in custody to appear on television or as requiring
that any governmental entity or place of custody or confinement provide a
two-way audio-visual communication system.]
✔